Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5308
License; application; fees; renewal.

(1) An applicant shall submit an application and the applicable fees for a license to act as a licensed operator of a public water system to the department.

(2) The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish and collect fees to cover all reasonable and necessary costs of licensing activities, including a reasonable reserve. If an application for a license is denied or withdrawn, the department may retain a portion of the fee to cover the costs of the application process. The fees shall be waived for initial licenses for low-income individuals, military families, and young workers as those terms are defined in the Uniform Credentialing Act.

(3) The director shall remit fees collected under the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act to the State Treasurer for credit to the Safe Drinking Water Act Cash Fund.

(4) A license shall expire on December 31 of odd-numbered years. The director may renew a license upon application by the licensee, payment of the applicable fees, and a determination by the director that the licensee has complied with the act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act.

Laws 1976, LB 821, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 190;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 39;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 90;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 131;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1227;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 77.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.